Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,147.04
Records; samples; subject to inspection.

Each person whose name appears on the label as handling agricultural, vegetable, or flower seeds subject to the Nebraska Seed Law shall keep for a period of three years complete records of each lot of agricultural, vegetable, or flower seed handled and keep for one year a file sample of each lot of seed after final disposition of the lot. All such records and samples pertaining to the shipment or shipments involved shall be accessible for inspection by the director during customary business hours.

Laws 1969, c. 759, § 5, p. 2871;

Laws 1985, LB 460, § 16;

Laws 1990, LB 37, § 4.